Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.140

Information to annul patent, certificate, or deed.

An information may be prosecuted for the purpose of annulling or vacating any letters patent, certificate, or deed, granted by the proper authorities of this state, when there is reason to believe that the same were obtained by fraud or through mistake or ignorance of a material fact, or when the patentee or those claiming under him or her have done or omitted an act in violation of the terms on which the letters, deeds or certificates were granted, or have by any other means forfeited the interests acquired under the same.

[ 2011 c 336 s 244; Code 1881 s 715; 1877 p 145 s 719; 1854 p 218 s 482; RRS s 1047.]